District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.23

Median family income.

The Mayor shall periodically publish or make available to lenders median family income for Washington, D.C. that may be relied upon by lenders for purposes of this chapter.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 223, 49 DCR 2551
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 42(a), 49 DCR 8140
D.C. Law 14-213 deleted “the” before “Washington D.C.”.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 223 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).